Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Article 1. General Requirements

§ 1221.
Condition of vehicle.

A motor vehicle, operated on any highway, shall be in good mechanical condition and shall be properly equipped.

§ 1221a.
Defective equipment warning.

The operator of a motor vehicle who receives a ticket for inoperative lights shall not be required to pay the civil penalty associated with the ticket provided that within 72 hours after receiving the ticket the issuing department receives proof that the defect has been repaired.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. April 27, 1998; amended

1999, No. 34

, § 2;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 198.

§ 1222.
Inspection of registered vehicles.

Except for school buses, which shall be inspected as prescribed in section 1282 of this title, and motor buses as defined in subdivision 4(17) of this title, which shall be inspected twice during the calendar year at six-month intervals, all motor vehicles registered in this State shall undergo a safety and visual emissions inspection once each year and all motor vehicles that are registered in this State and are 16 model years old or less shall undergo an emissions or on board diagnostic (OBD) systems inspection once each year as applicable. Any motor vehicle, trailer, or semi-trailer not currently inspected in this State shall be inspected within 15 days following the date of its registration in the State of Vermont.

The inspections shall be made at garages or qualified service stations, designated by the Commissioner as inspection stations, for the purpose of determining whether those motor vehicles are properly equipped and maintained in good mechanical condition; provided, however, the scope of the safety inspection of a motor vehicle other than a school bus or a commercial motor vehicle shall be limited to parts or systems that are relevant to the vehicle’s safe operation, and such vehicles shall not fail the safety portion of the inspection unless the condition of the part or system poses or may pose a danger to the operator or to other highway users.
(b) (1) The inspections shall be made at garages or qualified service stations, designated by the Commissioner as inspection stations, for the purpose of determining whether those motor vehicles are properly equipped and maintained in good mechanical condition; provided, however, the scope of the safety inspection of a motor vehicle other than a school bus or a commercial motor vehicle shall be limited to parts or systems that are relevant to the vehicle’s safe operation, and such vehicles shall not fail the safety portion of the inspection unless the condition of the part or system poses or may pose a danger to the operator or to other highway users.

The charges for such inspections made by garages or qualified service stations designated to conduct periodic inspections shall be subject to the approval of the Commissioner. If a fee is charged for inspection, it shall be based upon the hourly rate charged by each official inspection station or it may be a flat rate fee, and, in either instance, the fee shall be prominently posted and displayed beside the official inspection station certificate. In addition, the official inspection station may disclose the State inspection certificate charge on the repair order as a separate item and collect the charge from the consumer.

A person shall not operate a motor vehicle unless it has been inspected as required by this section and has a valid certification of inspection affixed to it. A person shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than $5.00, which penalty shall be exempt from surcharges under

13 V.S.A. § 7282(a)

, if he or she is cited for a violation of this section within the 14 days following expiration of the motor vehicle inspection sticker. The month of next inspection for all motor vehicles shall be shown on the current inspection certificate affixed to the vehicle.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, an exhibition vehicle of model year 1940 or before registered as prescribed in section 373 of this title or a trailer registered as prescribed in subdivision 371(a)(1)(A) of this title shall be exempt from inspection; provided, however, the vehicle must be equipped as originally manufactured, must be in good mechanical condition, and must meet the applicable standards of the inspection manual.

A vehicle used as a mail carrier under a contract with the U.S. Postal Service shall not fail inspection solely because, in converting the vehicle to be a right-hand drive vehicle, the right air bag in the front compartment has been disconnected or a nonfactory disconnect switch has been installed to disable the air bag.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 67

;

1967, No. 104

, § 1;

1969, No. 143

, § 3;

1969, No. 299

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1971;

1977, No. 20

, § 6;

1993, No. 64

, § 3;

1997, No. 32

, § 3;

2003, No. 118

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2005, No. 80

, § 55;

2009, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2011, No. 62

, § 38;

2017, No. 71

, § 27, eff. June 8, 2017;

2017, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 41, eff. May 21, 2018;

2017, No. 206

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. May 30, 2018;

2019, No. 59

, § 44, eff. June 14, 2019;

2019, No. 60

, § 33.

§ 1222a.
Emissions of diesel-powered commercial vehicles.

Except for voluntary exhaust-smoke emission testing, a vehicle may be stopped and an inspection performed under this section only if a law enforcement officer observes an apparent violation of the exhaust-smoke emission standard. If the equipment for smoke testing is not available, a law enforcement officer may require the operator or the owner to submit the vehicle for an emission test at a reasonably convenient time and place. Failure to submit to the test shall be conclusive evidence of the vehicle’s noncompliance with the exhaust-smoke emission standard. Any test administered under this section and any notice of violation issued shall be done by a sworn law enforcement officer trained and certified by the Department of Motor Vehicles. For purposes of this section:

“Commercial motor vehicle” is defined under subdivision 4103(4) of this title.

“Law enforcement officer” means an officer of the Department of Motor Vehicles trained and certified by the Department of Motor Vehicles to conduct exhaust-smoke emission inspections.

No diesel-powered commercial motor vehicle shall be operated on the highways of this State unless the vehicle complies with the exhaust-smoke emission standard and the rules adopted by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles. Any person who owns or operates such a vehicle while it is operated in violation of the provisions of this section or the rules adopted by the Commissioner shall be fined:

$200.00 for a first violation per vehicle, except that a person shall not be fined if, within 45 days from the date of the emission inspection, the defect is repaired and notification of the repair is provided to the Department of Motor Vehicles or the vehicle is taken out of service;

$200.00 for a second violation by the same vehicle within a two-year period if the first violation was repaired within 45 days from the date of the emission inspection, except that a person shall not be fined if the second violation occurs within 60 days from the date of repair of the first violation. For purposes of this subdivision, the “date of repair” shall be the date indicated in the notification of repair submitted to the Department of Motor Vehicles under subdivision (b)(1) of this subsection;

$400.00 for a second violation by the same vehicle within a two-year period if the first violation was not repaired within 45 days from the date of the emission inspection;

$ 400.00 for a third or subsequent violation committed by the same vehicle within a two-year period if the first violation was repaired within 45 days from the date of the emission inspection; and

$800.00 for a third or subsequent violation committed by the same vehicle within a two-year period if the first violation was not repaired within 45 days from the date of the emission inspection.

The Commissioner shall establish by rule a process by which the owner of a vehicle that has been taken out of service under this section and that is currently in violation of the exhaust-smoke emission standard shall, prior to sale or transfer of the vehicle, notify the purchaser or transferee that the vehicle does not comply with the exhaust-smoke emission standard.

All fines generated from the violation of this section shall be deposited in the Transportation Fund.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. July 1, 2007.

§ 1223.
Prohibitions.

A person shall not affix or cause to be affixed to a motor vehicle, trailer, or semi-trailer a certification of inspection that was not assigned by an official inspection station to such motor vehicle, trailer, or semi-trailer. No person shall reaffix or cause to be reaffixed an official sticker once removed; instead, replacement stickers shall be affixed as prescribed by the rules for replacement sticker agents. A person shall not knowingly operate a motor vehicle, trailer, or semi-trailer to which a certification of inspection is affixed if the certification of inspection was not assigned by an official station to that vehicle, trailer, or semi-trailer.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 104

, § 2; amended

1969, No. 143

, § 4;

2011, No. 46

, § 10.

§ 1224.
Inspection certificates.

For each inspection certificate issued by the Department, the designated station shall pay the Commissioner the fee required under section 1230 of this title. All unused inspection certificates and number tabs shall be returned to the Department within two months of the certificate’s expiration date. A designated inspection station shall receive a refund for each unused certificate returned during the two-month period. If the station’s designation is revoked or suspended under section 1228 of this title, the station shall return all unused certificates to the Department and shall not receive a refund.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 66i, eff. Sept. 1, 1998.

§ 1225.
Penalty.

The Commissioner may suspend the registration of any motor vehicle, trailer, or semi-trailer until the owner thereof complies with the requirements of this article.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 143

, § 5; amended

1971, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 19.

§ 1226.
Reciprocity.

The Commissioner may authorize the acceptance in this State of a certificate of inspection and approval issued in another state or province having inspection requirements similar to the requirements in effect in this State.
He or she may extend the time within which a certification of inspection shall be obtained in this State by the owner of a motor vehicle registered in this State and so inspected that was not in this State during the time an inspection was required.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 299

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1971.

§ 1227.
Certified inspection mechanics.

Periodic inspections may be performed only by mechanics who have been certified by the Commissioner, provided that an uncertified person employed as an inspection mechanic may perform inspections during the first 30 days that he or she is employed by the inspection station.

A person who applies for certification under this section shall:
(b) (1) A person who applies for certification under this section shall:

complete an application form prescribed by the Commissioner;

be at least 18 years of age; and

except as otherwise provided pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection (b), pass an examination based on the official inspection manual for each type of vehicle to be inspected and on the inspection requirements for each type of vehicle to be inspected.

A service member or veteran shall not be required to pass an examination pursuant to subdivision (1)(C) of this subsection if he or she has been designated by the U.S. Armed Forces as a 91B Wheeled Vehicle Mechanic or equivalent and has one or more of the following national certifications:

ASE Diesel Mechanic;

ASE Light Truck Engine Repair;

ASE Automobile Service Consultant;

Certified Hazardous Material Manager; or

Associate Safety Professional.

Upon an applicant’s satisfaction of the requirements of subsection (b) of this section, the Commissioner shall issue a certification that shall remain in effect for a period of five years or until surrendered, suspended, or revoked. Inspection mechanics certified by their employer as competent to perform inspections and who were continuously employed by one or more designated inspection stations for a period of at least one year at any time prior to July 1, 1998 shall not be required to take the examination.

To inspect a school bus, a certified inspection mechanic shall not be required to have a commercial driver license if he or she:

uses approved automated brake testing equipment in lieu of an inspection road test; or

only operates the school bus at a safe location that is not a highway as defined in

19 V.S.A. § 1(12)

as necessary to conduct an inspection road test.

As used in this section:

“Service member” means an individual who is an active member of:

the U.S. Armed Forces;

a reserve component of the U.S. Armed Forces;

the U.S. Coast Guard; or

the National Guard of any state.

“Veteran” means a former service member who received an honorable discharge or a general discharge under honorable conditions from active duty not more than two years prior to submitting an application for certification under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 66j, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2005, No. 188

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 38;

2017, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 1228.
Mechanic certification; inspection designation; revocation.

Any certification for mechanic or designation as an inspection station may be revoked or suspended for cause as described in the official inspection manuals.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 66k.

§ 1229.
Rules.

The Commissioner may adopt rules necessary to implement the provisions of sections 1222, 1224, 1227, and 1228 of this title, relating to inspections and certification of inspection mechanics.

In consultation with the Secretary of Natural Resources or the Secretary’s designee, the Commissioner shall adopt rules, pursuant to the provisions in 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, to establish a standard of exhaust-smoke emission for all diesel-powered commercial motor vehicles operated on the highways of this State. In establishing this standard, the Commissioner shall review standards in effect in other states and shall endeavor to maintain consistency with those standards. The rules adopted shall recognize different types and ages of vehicles and comprise standards that shall, at least in part, be based on the age of the vehicle. The standards shall be reviewed by the Commissioner periodically and may be revised in consultation with the Secretary of Natural Resources or the Secretary’s designee, as the Commissioner deems appropriate. Additionally, the Commissioner, in consultation with the Secretary of Natural Resources or the Secretary’s designee, shall adopt rules that select a method or methods for testing the exhaust emissions of diesel-powered commercial motor vehicles and that implement section 1222a of this title. The method selected shall be one that is designed to be performed without unreasonable delay for the vehicle being tested. The rules shall include a process by which the owner of a commercial motor vehicle may arrange with the Department of Motor Vehicles for the voluntary exhaust-smoke emission testing of a vehicle. For the purposes of this section, “commercial motor vehicle” is defined under subdivision 4103(4) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 66l; amended

2005, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 26, 2006.

§ 1230.
Charge.

For each inspection certificate issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles, the Commissioner shall be paid $6.00, provided that State and municipal inspection stations that inspect only State or municipally owned and registered vehicles shall not be required to pay a fee. All vehicle inspection certificate charge revenue shall be allocated to the Transportation Fund with one-half reserved for bridge maintenance activities.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 66m, eff. Sept. 1, 1998; amended

2005, No. 80

, § 54;

2009, No. 50

, § 50;

2009, No. 123

(Adj. Sess.), § 25;

2011, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 20;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 41.

§ 1231.
Administrative penalties.

The Commissioner may impose an administrative penalty of not more than $500.00 for each violation against a designated inspection station or a certified inspection mechanic who violates the laws relating to the performance of periodic motor vehicle inspections or the official inspection manuals within the prior three years.

Each violation is a separate and distinct offense and, in the case of a continuing violation, each day’s continuance may be deemed a separate and distinct offense. In no event shall the maximum amount imposed for a continuing offense exceed $1,000.00.

The Commissioner shall adopt rules establishing categories of violations for which administrative penalties are to be imposed under this section. Categories shall be based on the severity of the violation involved. Penalties assessed for each determination of violation of the inspection rules shall not exceed the following amounts per category:

Violation of State law relative to inspection (Category 1)—$500.00.

Violation of a Category 2 inspection rule—$300.00.

Violation of a Category 3 inspection rule—$250.00.

Violation of a Category 4 inspection rule—$100.00.

Violation of a Category 5 inspection rule—$50.00.

The alleged violator shall be given notice and opportunity for a hearing. Service of the notice shall be sufficient if sent by first-class mail to the station’s address or the most recent address provided by the mechanic. The notice shall include the following:

a factual description of the alleged violation;

a reference to the particular statute allegedly violated;

the amount of the proposed administrative penalty;

a warning that the person will be deemed to have waived his or her right to a hearing, that the penalty will be imposed if no hearing is requested within 15 days from date of notice, and that failure to pay a penalty may result in suspension of his or her license.

A person who receives notice under subsection (d) of this section shall be deemed to have waived the right to a hearing unless, within 15 days from date of the notice, the person requests a hearing in writing. If the person waives the right to a hearing, the Commissioner shall issue a final order finding the person in default and imposing the penalty.

The provisions of sections 105, 106, and 107 of this title shall apply to hearings conducted under this section.

The Commissioner may collect an unpaid administrative penalty by filing a civil action in Superior Court or through any other means available to State agencies.

If a penalty is not paid within 60 days after it is imposed, the Commissioner may suspend any license, certificate, registration, or permit issued under this subchapter.

The remedies authorized by this section shall be in addition to any other civil or criminal remedies provided by law for violation of this subchapter.

Penalties assessed under this section shall be deposited in the Transportation Fund.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 66n, eff. Jan. 1, 1999; amended

2019, No. 60

, § 11.